Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 201.171, is amended to read: 201.171 POSTING VOTING HISTORY; FAILURE TO VOTE; REGISTRATION REMOVED. Within deleted text begin six weeksdeleted text end new text begin ten daysnew text end after every election, the county auditor shall post the voting history for every person who voted in the election. After the close of the calendar year, the secretary of state shall determine if any registrants have not voted during the preceding four years. The secretary of state shall perform list maintenance by changing the status of those registrants to "inactive" in the statewide registration system. The list maintenance performed must be conducted in a manner that ensures that the name of each registered voter appears in the official list of eligible voters in the statewide registration system. A voter must not be removed from the official list of eligible voters unless the voter is not eligible or is not registered to vote. List maintenance must include procedures for eliminating duplicate names from the official list of eligible voters. The secretary of state shall also prepare a report to the county auditor containing the names of all registrants whose status was changed to "inactive." Registrants whose status was changed to "inactive" must register in the manner specified in section 201.054 before voting in any primary, special primary, general, school district, or special election, as required by section 201.018. Although not counted in an election, a late or rejected absentee or mail ballot must be considered a vote for the purpose of continuing registration under this section, but is not considered voting history for the purpose of public information lists available under section 201.091, subdivision 4.